Utah statutes.
58-20a-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- Renewal.

(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license for an environmental health scientist in accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.

(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal period by as much as one year to stagger the renewal cycles it administers.

(2)  Each license for an environmental health scientist-in-training shall  be issued for a term of two years and may not be renewed.

(3)  Each license issued under this chapter  automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.



Enacted by Chapter 95, 1995 General Session

